Hawaii statutes.
§201H-100 Housing loan programs; fees.
The corporation may establish, revise, charge, and collect fees, premiums, and
charges as necessary, reasonable, or convenient, for its housing loan
programs. The fees, premiums, and charges shall be deposited into the housing
loan program revenue bond revolving fund established for the particular housing
loan program or part thereof from which the fees, premiums, and charges are
derived as determined by the corporation. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4; am L 2015,
c 237, §17]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next